New Jersey, session 222, S3973.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 3 of P.L.1999, c.10 (C.45:5A-13.3) is amended to read as follows: 3.    The educational course of study required of licensed electrical contractors for each triennial registration period shall include 34 hours of continuing education as follows: a.     A 10-hour course of study relating to the most recent edition of the National Electrical Code that has been adopted on the date of licensure renewal by the Commissioner of Community Affairs pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1975, c.217 (C.52:27D-123), nine hours of which shall pertain to the code and one hour of which shall pertain to applicable State statutes and regulations; and b.    Twenty-four hours of instruction approved by the board covering one or more of the following subjects: (1)   Installation, erection, repair or alteration of electrical equipment for the generation, transmission or utilization of electrical energy; (2)   Transmission or utilization of electrical energy; (3)   Job estimating, management and business practices; (4)   Supervisory responsibilities required of licensees pursuant to the laws of this State; and (5)   Any other subject relevant to electrical contracting and construction as determined by the board. (cf: P.L.1999, c.10, s.3) 2.    Section 6 of P.L.2001, c.21 (C.45:5A-11.4) is amended to read as follows: 6. a. The board shall require each Class A journeyman electrician, other than a Class A journeyman electrician licensed to practice electrical contracting issued by the board, and each Class B wireman, as a condition for triennial license renewal pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1972, c.108 (C.45:1-7), to complete a 15-hour course of study relating to the most recent edition of the National Electrical Code adopted by the Commissioner of Community Affairs pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1975, c.217 (C.52:27D-123). b.    The board shall approve all programs of education for the 15-hour course of study established pursuant to subsection a. of this section and the instructors for those courses. (cf: P.L.2021, c.479, s.8) 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.